Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.160

Director—Appointment.

If a director of planning is provided for, he or she shall be appointed:

(1) By the commission when a commission is created under RCW 36.70.030;

(2) If a planning department is established as provided in RCW 36.70.040, then he or she shall be appointed by the board.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4112; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.160. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 16.]